Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska83-101.06
Department of Health and Human Services; duties.

The Department of Health and Human Services shall:

(1) Administer the clinical programs and services of the Beatrice State Developmental Center, the Lincoln Regional Center, the Norfolk Regional Center, the Hastings Regional Center, and such other medical facilities, including skilled nursing care and intermediate care facilities, as may be provided by the department;

(2) Plan, develop, administer, and operate mental health and mental retardation clinics, programs, and services;

(3) Plan, develop, and execute the clinical programs and services carried on by the department; and

(4) Represent the department in its work with the University of Nebraska Medical Center concerning psychiatric services.

Laws 1969, c. 818, § 1, p. 3114;

Laws 1973, LB 536, § 3;

Laws 1987, LB 112, § 1;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 925;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 83-1,147;

Laws 1996, LB 1155, § 80.